apertium-sme-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="und/er__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ere</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eret</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ra</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fl/o__n">
  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e>       <p><l>oene</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørne</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oer</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ør</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oa</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oene</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørne</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oer</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ør</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oen</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oene</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ørne</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oer</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ør</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oet</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oa</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skjell__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="id/é__n">
  <e>       <p><l>eene</l>      <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eer</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>een</l>       <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/åg__n">
  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e>       <p><l>ægene</l>     <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æger</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åga</l>       <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ægene</l>     <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ågene</l>     <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>æger</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åger</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ågen</l>      <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>åg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="vidunder">        <i>vidund</i><par n="und/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="turné">           <i>turn</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
<e lm="under">           <i>und</i><par n="und/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aksjonskomité"><i>aksjonskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arrangementskomité"><i>arrangementskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attaché"><i>attach</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autodafé"><i>autodaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blestkomité"><i>blestkomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bokautodafé"><i>bokautodaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bokkafé"><i>bokkaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buffé"><i>buff</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byggekomité"><i>byggekomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chaussé"><i>chauss</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="consommé"><i>consomm</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="desisjonskomité"><i>desisjonskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diaré"><i>diar</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diatomé"><i>diatom</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drasjé"><i>drasj</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dublé"><i>dubl</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dysmenoré"><i>dysmenor</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eksekutivkomité"><i>eksekutivkomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entré"><i>entr</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="envoyé"><i>envoy</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="festkomité"><i>festkomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finanskomité"><i>finanskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flygeidé"><i>flygeid</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foajé"><i>foaj</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foredragsturné"><i>foredragsturn</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsvarsattaché"><i>forsvarsattach</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fortauskafé"><i>fortauskaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frelsesarmé"><i>frelsesarm</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frikassé"><i>frikass</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frotté"><i>frott</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fårefrikassé"><i>fårefrikass</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gelé"><i>gel</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glacé"><i>glac</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gonoré"><i>gonor</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hønsefrikassé"><i>hønsefrikass</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jernbanekupé"><i>jernbanekup</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="justiskomité"><i>justiskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kafé"><i>kaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalvefrikassé"><i>kalvefrikass</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamé"><i>kam</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanapé"><i>kanap</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karré"><i>karr</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klisjé"><i>klisj</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komité"><i>komit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsertturné"><i>konsertturn</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrollkomité"><i>kontrollkomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koryfé"><i>koryf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kupé"><i>kup</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lammefrikassé"><i>lammefrikass</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lamé"><i>lam</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marineattaché"><i>marineattach</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matiné"><i>matin</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="militærattaché"><i>militærattach</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moské"><i>mosk</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mødrekupé"><i>mødrekup</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nattkafé"><i>nattkaf</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orkidé"><i>orkid</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paté"><i>pat</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plankomité"><i>plankomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portemoné"><i>portemon</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presseattaché"><i>presseattach</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protesjé"><i>protesj</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puré"><i>pur</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyoré"><i>pyor</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="røykekupé"><i>røykekup</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sentralkomité"><i>sentralkomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skarabé"><i>skarab</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidaritetskomité"><i>solidaritetskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spondé"><i>spond</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stortingskomité"><i>stortingskomit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="supé"><i>sup</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traké"><i>trak</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troké"><i>trok</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varieté"><i>variet</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ad hoc-komité"><i>ad<b/>hoc-komit</i><par n="id/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skjell"><i>skjell</i><par n="skjell__n"/></e>
